Florida, session 2026, HB1123.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1008.251, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1008.251 The First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot
Program.—Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the First
Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot Program is created for a
period of 3 school years. The purpose of the program is to
assist school districts in providing a summer reading immersion
program for students who completed grade 1 and who are at risk
of having a reading deficiency or exhibit a substantial
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1123 2026
deficiency in reading. For purposes of the pilot program, a
student is deemed to be at risk of having a reading deficiency
when he or she scores a level one on the midyear or third
administration of the coordinated screening and progress
monitoring under s. 1008.25.
(1) The Department of Education shall:
(a) Select two school districts to participate in the
pilot program.
(b) Create a first grade summer reading immersion program
for school districts to implement each year of the pilot
program. The program must:
1. Be a minimum of 6 weeks in length.
2. Focus on:
a. Foundational grade 1 reading skills.
b. Phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and
reading comprehension.
3. Assess student learning gains and reading skills at the
conclusion of the program using the first grade final
administration of the coordinated screening and progress
monitoring or a state-approved diagnostic assessment.
(c) Establish reporting requirements for participating
school districts.
(2) Each participating school district shall:
(a) Invite students who have completed grade 1 who are at
risk of having a reading deficiency or exhibit a substantial
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1123 2026
deficiency in reading to attend the first grade summer reading
immersion program.
(b) Administer the first grade summer reading immersion
program pursuant to department requirements and guidance.
(c) Provide the data and information requested by the
department.
(d) Provide periodic updates to the department on the
implementation of the first grade summer reading immersion
program.
(e) Upon completion of each first grade summer reading
immersion program, provide a report on student learning gains
and reading skills at the conclusion of the program, including
participation rates.
(3) Upon the completion of the pilot program, the
department shall provide a report to the Legislature. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) Student outcomes for students who participated in the
first grade summer reading immersion program.
(b) Rates of student participation in the first grade
summer reading immersion program.
(c) Policy recommendations for further implementation of
first grade summer reading immersion program.
(4) This section shall expire upon the submission of the
department's report to the Legislature pursuant to subsection
(3).
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1123-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1123 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1123-00